Utah statutes.
35A-3-201.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Child care" means the services referred to in Subsection 35A-3-102(4) provided for:

(a)  children through age 12; and

(b)  children with disabilities through age 18.

(2)  "Child care provider association" means an association:

(a)  that has functioned as a child care provider association in the state for at least three years; and

(b)  is affiliated with a national child care provider association.

(3)  "Committee" means the Child Care Advisory Committee created in Section 35A-3-205.

(4)  "Director" means the director of the Office of Child Care.

(5)  "Office" means the Office of Child Care created in Section 35A-3-202.



Amended by Chapter 13, 2003 General Session

